Illinois, session 104th, SB1303.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 6-305.2 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/6-305.2)7    Sec. 6-305.2. Limited liability for damage. 8    (a) Damage to private passenger vehicle. A person who 9rents a motor vehicle to another may hold the renter liable for 10physical or mechanical damage to the rented motor vehicle that 11occurs during the time the motor vehicle is under the rental 12agreement as well as loss of use which stems from such damage.13    (b) Limits on liability due to theft for a vehicle having 14an MSRP of $50,000 or less. The total liability of a renter who 15rents from another a motor vehicle that has an MSRP of $50,000 16or less and that is stolen shall be the actual and reasonable 17costs incurred by the loss due to theft of the rental motor 18vehicle up to $5,000; provided, however, that if it is 19established that the renter or authorized driver failed to 20exercise ordinary care while in possession of the vehicle or 21that the renter or authorized driver committed or aided and 22abetted the commission of a theft, then the damages shall be 23the actual and reasonable costs of the rental vehicle up to its   SB1303- 2 -LRB104 07486 LNS 17529 b1fair market value, as determined by the customary market for 2the sale of the vehicle.3    Beginning June 1, 2000, and annually each June 1 4thereafter, the maximum amount that may be recovered from an 5authorized driver under this subsection (b) shall be increased 6by $500 above the maximum recovery allowed immediately prior 7to June 1 of that year.8    (b-5) Limits on liability due to theft for a vehicle 9having an MSRP of more than $50,000. The total liability of a 10renter who rents from another a motor vehicle that has an MSRP 11of more than $50,000 and that is stolen shall be the actual and 12reasonable cost incurred by the loss due to theft of the rental 13motor vehicle up to $40,000; provided, however that if it is 14established that the renter or authorized driver failed to 15exercise ordinary care while in possession of the vehicle or 16that the renter or authorized driver committed or aided and 17abetted the commission of a theft, then the damages shall be 18the actual and reasonable costs of the rental vehicle up to its 19fair market value, as determined by the customary market for 20the sale of the vehicle.21    The maximum recovery for a motor vehicle with a 22Manufacturer's Suggested Retail Price (MSRP) of more than 23$50,000 under this subsection (b-5) shall not exceed $40,000 24on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th 25General Assembly. On October 1, 2016, and for the next 3 years 26thereafter, the maximum amount that may be recovered from an   SB1303- 3 -LRB104 07486 LNS 17529 b1authorized driver under this subsection (b-5) shall be 2increased by $2,500 above the prior year's maximum recovery. 3On October 1, 2020, and for each year thereafter, the maximum 4amount that may be recovered from an authorized driver under 5this subsection (b-5) shall be increased by $1,000 above the 6prior year's maximum recovery.7    (b-10) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 8Act of the 103rd General Assembly and for 6 months after, a 9person who rents a motor vehicle to another shall provide 10notice to the renter of the motor vehicle of the changes 11reflected in this amendatory Act of the 103rd General 12Assembly. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous and 13unobscured place that is separate and apart from any other 14information. 15    (c) Multiple recoveries prohibited. Any person who rents a 16motor vehicle to another may not hold the renter liable for any 17amounts that the rental company recovers from any other party.18    (d) Repair estimates. A person who rents a motor vehicle 19to another may not collect or attempt to collect the amount 20described in subsection (b) or (b-5) unless the rental company 21obtains an estimate from a repair company or an appraiser in 22the business of providing such appraisals on the costs of 23repairing the motor vehicle, makes a copy of the estimate 24available upon request to the renter who may be liable under 25subsection (a), or the insurer of the renter, and submits a 26copy of the estimate with any claim to collect the amount   SB1303- 4 -LRB104 07486 LNS 17529 b1described in subsection (b) or (b-5). In order to collect the 2amount described in subsection (b-5), a person renting a motor 3vehicle to another must also provide the renter's personal 4insurance company with reasonable notice and an opportunity to 5inspect damages. 6    (d-5) In the event of loss due to theft of the rental motor 7vehicle with a MSRP more than $50,000, the rental company 8shall provide reasonable notice of the theft to the renter's 9personal insurance company. 10    (e) Duty to mitigate. A claim against a renter resulting 11from damage or loss to a rental vehicle must be reasonably and 12rationally related to the actual loss incurred. A rental 13company shall mitigate damages where possible and shall not 14assert or collect any claim for physical damage which exceeds 15the actual costs of the repair, including all discounts or 16price reductions.17    (f) No rental company shall require a deposit or an 18advance charge against the credit card of a renter, in any 19form, for damages to a vehicle which is in the renter's 20possession, custody, or control. No rental company shall 21require any payment for damage to the rental vehicle, upon the 22renter's return of the vehicle in a damaged condition, until 23after the cost of the damage to the vehicle and liability 24therefor is agreed to between the rental company and renter or 25is determined pursuant to law.26    (g) If insurance coverage exists under the renter's   SB1303- 5 -LRB104 07486 LNS 17529 b1personal insurance policy and the coverage is confirmed during 2regular business hours, the renter may require that the rental 3company must submit any claims to the renter's personal 4insurance carrier as the renter's agent. The rental company 5shall not make any written or oral representations that it 6will not present claims or negotiate with the renter's 7insurance carrier. For purposes of this Section, confirmation 8of coverage includes telephone confirmation from insurance 9company representatives during regular business hours. After 10confirmation of coverage, the amount of claim shall be 11resolved between the insurance carrier and the rental company.12(Source: P.A. 103-520, eff. 1-1-24.)